Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-141
Inspector or investigator; appointment by department.

Whenever the department deems it necessary to appoint an inspector or investigator to assist it in performing its duty, the department may appoint a person who holds an active credential in the appropriate profession or any other qualified person who has been trained in investigational procedures and techniques to serve as such inspector or investigator.

Laws 1953, c. 247, § 3, p. 850;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 1108, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 30;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-124.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 41.